Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2021
County, municipality, or agency; facility or system; powers and duties; referendum and limited referendum provisions; applicability.

A county, municipality, or agency may purchase, plan, develop, construct, equip, maintain, and improve facilities and systems and may lease or acquire land in fee by gift, grant, purchase, or condemnation as necessary for the construction and operation of a facility or system. A county, municipality, or agency may also make and enter into contracts with any person for the planning, development, construction, maintenance, or operation of such facility or system or any part thereof. Measures adopted or enacted by municipalities with respect to any facility or system shall constitute measures subject to limited referendum under subsection (2) of section 18-2528, and a municipality shall be authorized to exempt all subsequent measures relating to the same project from referendum and limited referendum as provided under subsection (4) of such section.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 21.